Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1070.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2315(a.1)(3) introductory paragraph and (iii) and (iv) of Title 58 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 2315. Statewide initiatives.* * *(a.1) Deposit and distribution.--Following distribution under section 2314(c), (c.1) and (c.2) (relating to distribution of fee) from fees collected for 2011 and each year thereafter, 40% of the remaining revenue in the fund shall be deposited into the Marcellus Legacy Fund and appropriated to the commission and distributed within three months after the date the fee is due as follows:* * *123456789101112131415161718 (3) Twenty-five percent to the Highway Bridge Improvement Restricted Account in the Motor License Fund to counties to be distributed to [fund the cost of the replacement or repair of locally owned at-risk deteriorated bridges] improve any county bridge or municipal bridge in the county according to applicable Federal and State laws and regulations. Funds shall be distributed to counties proportionately based on the population of the county as follows:* * *(iii) The Department of Transportation shall release money under this paragraph upon approval of a plan submitted by a county [or municipality to repair an at-risk deteriorated bridge] to improve any county bridge or municipal bridge in the county, regardless of the bridge's eligibility for Federal aid. The plan must include funding for replacement or repair.(iv) A county of the first or second class may submit a plan to use its funds under this paragraph [for at-risk deteriorated] to improve bridges owned by a public transportation authority according to applicable Federal and State laws and regulations.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1070PN1250 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324